Alabama, session 2026rs, HB552.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall be known and be cited as the
Aerospace Export Safeguard and Innovation Act.
Section 2. It is the intent of the Legislature to
mitigate the impact of international trade disruptions on the
Page 1

mitigate the impact of international trade disruptions on the
HB552 INTRODUCED
aerospace and defense sectors and to support innovation and
secure export pathways.
Section 3. For the purpose of this act, the following
terms and phrases have the following meanings:
(1) DEPARTMENT. The Alabama Department of Commerce.
(2) ELIGIBLE AEROSPACE ENTITY. A company or research
institution engaged in aerospace manufacturing, research, or
defense contracting.
(3) TARIFF-RELATED DISRUPTION. Any negative economic
impact resulting from United States or foreign tariffs that
affect aerospace inputs, exports, or partnerships.
Section 4. (a) The Aerospace Export Resilience Grant
Program is established and shall be administered by the
department.
(b) Grants shall be awarded to eligible aerospace
entities experiencing tariff-related disruptions.
(c) Grant funds may be used for:
(1) Maintaining export operations;
(2) Workforce retention;
(3) Supplier diversification; or
(4) International compliance.
(d) The aggregate amount of grants awarded pursuant to
this section shall not exceed ten million dollars
($10,000,000) in a calendar year.
(e) The department, by rule, shall establish program
guidelines, including application requirements and oversight
procedures.
Section 5. (a) The Advanced Materials and Components
Page 2

Section 5. (a) The Advanced Materials and Components
HB552 INTRODUCED
Security Grant Program is established and shall be
administered by the department.
(b) Grants shall be awarded to:
(1) Support research into domestic or tariff-neutral
alternatives to foreign aerospace materials;
(2) Facilitate public-private partnerships with
universities and federal labs; and
(3) Encourage domestic production of critical aerospace
inputs.
(c) Projects shall be selected based on national
security relevance, economic feasibility, and supply chain
risk reduction.
(d) The aggregate amount of grants awarded pursuant to
this section shall not exceed ten million dollars
($10,000,000) in a calendar year.
(e) The department, by rule, shall establish program
guidelines, including application requirements and oversight
procedures.
Section 6. (a) The Defense Export Facilitation Services
Program is established and shall be administered by the
department.
(b) The department shall expand support services for
aerospace firms engaged in exporting defense-related goods.
(c) Services may include:
(1) Compliance assistance with International Traffic in
Arms Regulations (ITAR);
(2) Training on export control laws and foreign
licensing; and
Page 3

licensing; and
HB552 INTRODUCED
(3) Legal and logistical support for navigating foreign
countermeasures.
Section 7. (a) The department shall provide Supply
Chain Continuity Planning Assistance.
(b) The department shall provide aerospace companies
technical assistance to:
(1) Map critical supply dependencies;
(2) Develop contingency plans for procurement and
transportation; and
(3) Identify domestic or alternative foreign sourcing
opportunities.
Section 8. (a) There is established the Aerospace Trade
Monitoring Council.
(b) The council shall consist of five members, each
appointed by the Governor, including representatives from
100 industry, academia, and economic development agencies.
101 (c) The first meeting shall be held by September 1,
102 2026. The council shall meet no less than annually and
103 otherwise as necessary.
104 (d) The council shall:
105 (1) Monitor aerospace trade patterns and tariffs;
106 (2) Evaluate exposure to trade disruptions;
107 (3) Recommend adaptive policy strategies to the
108 Legislature and Governor; and
109 (4) Report annually to the Governor and the Legislature
110 on its activities, findings, and recommendations.
111 Section 9. This act shall become effective on July 1,
112 2026.
Page 4